Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 5. Universal Service Fund

§ 37-15-501.
Universal service fund created; contributions; administration.

There is hereby established the universal service fund to be administered in accordance with this section. The fund shall be administered by the commission. All telecommunications companies shall contribute to the universal service fund. The dates for contributions to the fund and disbursements from the fund shall be set by the commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, as necessary to accomplish the objectives of the fund as specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this section. The costs of administering the fund may be included in determining required contributions.

The commission shall after notice and opportunity for hearing, designate the method by which the contributions shall be calculated, collected and distributed. The commission shall authorize a monthly charge to customers, in the amount specified by the commission, to recover each contributor’s required payment to the universal service fund. Any charge related to mobile telecommunications service shall only apply if the customer’s place of primary use is in this state as provided by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. §§ 116 to 126. The provisions of the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act shall apply to this subsection.

The commission shall administer the monies in the universal service fund to assist only those customers of telecommunications companies located in areas of this state with relatively high rates for noncompetitive essential local exchange services. Services deemed competitive under W.S. 37-15-202(a), (c) or (d) shall not be eligible for universal service fund support under this article. The commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, shall determine a reasonable amount and a fair method of distributing monies. The commission may authorize a credit to customer bills, in the amount specified by the commission, to reflect distributions received by the local exchange company from the universal service fund. The commission shall ensure that the method shall promote the emergence of competition in providing local exchange service.

In accordance with the method of distribution determined by the commission, a telecommunications company shall, unless it elects to receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant to the method set forth in subsection (g) of this section, receive funds under this section to the extent that its noncompetitive essential local exchange service prices, after consideration of any contributions from the federal universal service fund, exceed the price benchmark established in subsection (h) of this section.

The following limitations shall be applied to operation of the universal service fund:

The operation of the universal service fund may be suspended by the commission, based upon a public interest finding, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, that the fund is not then serving its intended purpose;

In the event that distributions made pursuant to subsection (g) of this section cause total distributions from the universal service fund in any fiscal year to exceed one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the amount distributed in fiscal year 2013-2014, the commission shall reduce payments among those electing distributions under subsection (g) of this section, pro rata, so as to reduce the total distribution to one hundred twenty-five (125%) of the fiscal year 2013-2014 distribution amount.

The commission’s decisions under this section shall be subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

A telecommunications company that undertakes the requirements set forth in this subsection may make a one-time, irrevocable before July 1, 2023, election in writing to the commission to receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant to this subsection rather than pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. In order to receive funds pursuant to this subsection, the company shall provide essential local exchange service, or its functional equivalent, upon reasonable request throughout the local exchange area of a rural incumbent local exchange carrier, as defined by the federal communications commission on January 1, 2015, at a price not exceeding the price benchmark established in subsection (h) of this section. A telecommunications company which elects to receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant to this subsection shall receive funds to the extent that its loop costs, as reflected in the company’s most recent annual filing of unseparated loop costs filed with the Universal Service Administration Company, exceed the company’s most recent annual federal universal service funds receipts and annual local revenues. In calculating annual local revenues the commission shall utilize the imputed price benchmark established in subsection (h) of this section. If an otherwise qualified company elects to receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant to this subsection, but does not file an annual unseparated loop cost report with the Universal Service Administration Company, it shall file the equivalent information with the commission.

The price benchmark shall be thirty dollars ($30.00) until July 1, 2023 unless otherwise adjusted by the commission pursuant to this subsection. On and after July 1, 2019, the commission shall review the price benchmark one (1) time every four (4) years and, after review, shall adjust the benchmark as necessary to assure that it approximates one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the weighted statewide average essential local exchange service price. The commission may change the price benchmark at any time if, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the commission determines that the price benchmark does not approximate one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the weighted statewide average essential local exchange service price and that the price benchmark should be adjusted by ten percent (10%) or more.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-501; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 46, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 13, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the special revenue fund” in the first sentence in (a).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) deleted “in order to achieve the goals set forth in W.S.

37-15-102

” at the end of the first sentence; and in (d) inserted “essential” preceding “local exchange” twice, and substituted “service prices” for “rates” twice.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence in (b), substituted “a monthly charge” for “an additional monthly charge”; in (c), substituted “noncompetitive essential local exchange services” for “essential services,” and inserted the present second sentence; rewrote (d); in (e), added the introductory language, designated the existing language as (e)(i), and added (e)(ii); and added (g) and (h).

The 2019 amendment,

in (g) and (h), substituted “2023” for “2019.”

Laws 2019, ch. 7, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2019.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 324, appropriates $75,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office to fund a study by the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee on the current state telecommunications universal service fund, the effects of changing the current fund from a price-based fund to a cost-based fund, implications and desirability of supporting only a single line for each business and residential customer receiving support through the fund, the universal service fund subsidy level and the fund's appropriate structure. Expenditures will fund necessary committee staff support and consultants to the legislature, as approved by the management council. Findings and recommendations are to be submitted to the legislature in sufficient time for consideration during the 2005 general session.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Quoted

in

Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 11 P.3d 938,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 37-15-502.
Universal service fund eligibility and distribution to carriers.

Telecommunications companies which use cellular, radio spectrum or other wireless technology to provide supported services to customers who are otherwise eligible to receive universal service support pursuant to W.S.

37-15-501

, may establish eligibility to receive universal service fund distributions in an amount to be determined by the commission, provided that:

The telecommunications company will offer and advertise all universal service fund supported services throughout the entire local exchange area;

The telecommunications company will provide unlimited local calling throughout an entire local exchange area for a flat fee;

The telecommunications company’s bill to the customer reflects a credit for the amount of distribution the company receives from the state universal service fund for providing universal service fund supported services to that customer; and

The company and services meet such additional criteria, if any, the commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, determines are necessary. During its consideration and determination, the commission shall consider technological and competitive neutrality.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 178, § 1; 2007, ch. 142, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.